Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.440

Annual report of domestic and foreign corporations.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation registered to conduct affairs in this state, shall deliver an annual report to the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4131; 1993 c 356 s 22; 1982 c 35 s 152; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 88.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.